Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 41.2 Automated Traffic Violation Monitoring Systems

31-41.2-1.
Short title.

This act shall be cited as the “Rhode Island Automated Traffic Violation Monitoring System Act of 2005.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared that the effective and efficient enforcement of traffic laws, rules and regulations will assist in insuring safe travel on the streets and highways of this state. It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Rhode Island to authorize and utilize the best available technology for the monitoring and prosecution of civil traffic violations, including automated traffic violation detection systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-3.
Automated traffic violation monitoring systems.

The state department of transportation and the municipalities of this state are hereby authorized to install and operate automated traffic violation detection systems. Such systems shall be limited to systems which monitor and detect violations of traffic control signals. For purposes of this chapter an automated traffic violation detection system means a system with one or more motor vehicle sensors which produces images of motor vehicles being operated in violation of traffic signal laws.

No automated traffic violation detection system shall be installed pursuant to this section which has not been approved for use by the director of the state department of transportation. The director of the state department of transportation shall promulgate regulations for the approval and operation of said systems pursuant to the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42. Systems shall be approved if the director is satisfied they meet standards of efficiency and accuracy. All systems installed for use under this chapter must be able to record the image of the vehicle and the license plates of the vehicle.

In the event that the system is to be installed other than by the state department of transportation on state-maintained streets or roads, the director of the department of transportation must approve such installation.

The state department of transportation and/or the municipalities may enter into an agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide automated traffic violation detection systems or equipment and to maintain such systems.

Compensation to a private entity that provides traffic signal monitoring devices shall be based on the value of such equipment and related support services, and shall not be based on the revenue generated by such systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 31.

31-41.2-3.1.
Installation and signage.

The implementing jurisdiction(s) shall post a warning sign at each system location where a traffic control signal monitoring system is located.

Such warning signs shall conform to appropriate, federally accepted standards for traffic control signs.

Sign signage shall remain at each system location so long as a traffic control signal monitoring system is in operation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-4.
Procedure — Notice.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all prosecutions based on evidence produced by an automated traffic-violation-detection system shall follow the procedures established in chapter 41.1 of this title; chapter 18 of title 8, except the provisions providing for payments to the state in §§

8-18-4

and

8-18-6

, and the rules promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal for the hearing of civil traffic violations. A summons may be issued by an officer solely based on evidence obtained by use of an automated traffic-violation-detection system. All summons issued based on evidence obtained from an automated traffic-violation-detection system shall be issued within twenty-eight (28) days of the violation.

Notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, no city or town shall be required to make payments to the state in implementing any provision of this chapter until July 1, 2013, nor after July 1, 2015.

It shall be sufficient to commence a prosecution based on evidence obtained from an automated traffic-violation-detection system that a copy of the summons and supporting documentation be mailed to the address of the registered owner kept on file by the registry of motor vehicles pursuant to §

31-3-34

. For purposes of this section, the date of issuance shall be the date of mailing.

The officer issuing the summons shall certify under penalties of perjury that the evidence obtained from the automated traffic-violation-detection system was sufficient to demonstrate a violation of the motor vehicle code. Such certification shall be sufficient in all prosecutions pursuant to this chapter to justify the entry of a default judgment upon sufficient proof of actual notice in all cases where the summons is not answered within the time period permitted.

The summons shall contain all the information provided for on the uniform summons as referred to in §

31-41.1-1

and the rules of procedure promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal, subject to the approval of the supreme court pursuant to §

8-6-2

.

In addition to the summons, the following information shall be attached to the summons:

Copies of two (2) or more photographs, or microphotographs, or other recorded images taken as proof of the violation;

A signed statement by a trained law enforcement officer that, based on inspection of recorded images, the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of §

31-13-4

;

A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of this chapter; and

A statement that the person who receives a summons under this chapter may either pay the civil penalty in accordance with the provisions of §

31-41.1-3

, or elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 13; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 31; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 9, § 13; P.L. 2014, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 53; P.L. 2017, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 473, § 1.

31-41.2-5.
Hearings.

Evidence from an automated traffic violation detection system shall be considered substantive evidence in the prosecution of all civil traffic violations. Evidence from an automated traffic violation detection system approved by the director of transportation shall be admitted without further authentication and such evidence may be deemed sufficient to sustain a civil traffic violation. In addition to any other defenses as set forth herein, any and all defenses cognizable at law shall be available to the individual who receives the summons commencing a prosecution under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 9, § 13.

31-41.2-6.
Driver/registered owner liability.

The registered owner of the motor vehicle shall be primarily responsible in all prosecutions brought pursuant to the provisions of this chapter except as otherwise provided in this section.

In all prosecutions of civil traffic violations based on evidence obtained from an automated traffic violation detection system, the registered owner of a vehicle which has been operated in violation of a civil traffic violation, may be liable for such violation. The registered owner of the vehicle may assume liability for the violation by paying the fine; or by defending the violation pursuant to the procedures in §

31-41.2-4

.

The lessee of a leased vehicle shall be considered the owner of a motor vehicle for purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-7.
Use of evidence in criminal and civil cases.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the use of evidence produced by an automated traffic violation detection system in a criminal or private civil proceeding provided that the admissibility of such evidence shall follow the applicable laws and rules of procedure and rules of evidence which apply in criminal and civil cases.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-7.1.
Nature of violations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

No violation for which a civil penalty is imposed under this chapter shall be considered a moving violation, nor shall be included on the driving record of the person on whom the liability is imposed, nor shall it be used for insurance rating purposes in providing motor vehicle insurance coverage until there is a final adjudication of the violation.

Impositions of a penalty pursuant to this chapter shall not be deemed a criminal conviction of an owner or operator.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-8.
Security of records.

The recorded images produced by an automated traffic violation detection system shall not be deemed “public records” subject to disclosure pursuant to subsection 38-2-2(4)(i).

All recorded images that do not identify a violation shall be destroyed within ninety (90) days of the date the image was recorded, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

All recorded images that identify a violation shall be destroyed within one year after the citation is resolved by administrative payment, trial or other final disposition of the citation, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The privacy of records produced pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained; provided, that aggregate data not containing personal identifying information may be released.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

31-41.2-9.
Reports.

The agency or municipality authorizing the installation of automated traffic signal detection systems shall prepare an annual report containing data on:

The number of citations issued at each particular intersection;

The number of those violations paid by mail;

The number of those violations found after trial or hearing;

The number of violations dismissed after trial or hearing;

The number of accidents at each intersection;

A description as to the type of accident;

An indication regarding whether there were any injuries involved in any accident reported;

The cost to maintain the automated traffic signal detection system; and

The amount of revenue obtained from the automated traffic signal detection system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 31.